cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/app/scripts/vendor/speak/dictsource/grc_rules
// Spelling to Phoneme rules for: Ancient Greek

// Preliminary character substitution:
//   Convert tonos, oxia and perispomeni to varia
//   Remove psili (soft breathing)
//   Convert dasia accent to a separate prefix character ("h")
//   Remove iota subscripts
//   Replace Latin characters by same-shape Greek characters

.replace
′	'
a	α  // Latin->Greek
o	ο
v	ν
A	Α
B	Β
E	Ε
Z	Ζ
H	Η
I	Ι
K	Κ
M	Μ
N	Ν
O	Ο
P	Ρ
T	Τ
Y	Υ
X	Χ

// replace Latin characters by Greek equivalents
th	θ
ph	φ
kh	χ
ps	ψ
b	β
g	γ
d	δ
e	ε
z	ζ
q	η // (long e; not standard transliteration but may be easier to type than η)
i	ι
k	κ
l	λ
m	μ
n	ν
x	ξ
p	π
r	ρ
s	σ
t	τ
u	υ
y	υ
w	ω // (long o; not standard transliteration but may be easier to type


// alpha
ά	ὰ    // tonos
ά	ὰ    // oxia
ᾴ	ᾲ
ᾶ	ὰ
ᾷ	ᾲ

ἀ	α
ἁ	hα
ἂ	ὰ
ἃ	hὰ
ἄ	ὰ
ἅ	hὰ
ἆ	ὰ
ἇ	hὰ

ᾀ	ᾳ
ᾁ	hᾳ
ᾂ	ᾲ
ᾃ	hᾲ
ᾄ	ᾲ
ᾅ	hᾲ
ᾆ	ᾲ
ᾇ	hᾲ

// epsilon
έ	ὲ
έ	ὲ
ἐ	ε
ἑ	hε
ἒ	ὲ
ἓ	hὲ
ἔ	ὲ
ἕ	hὲ

// eta
ή	ὴ
ή	ὴ
ῄ	ῂ
ῆ	ὴ
ῇ	ῂ

ἠ	η
ἡ	hη
ἢ	ὴ
ἣ	hὴ
ἤ	ὴ
ἥ	hὴ
ἦ	ὴ
ἧ	hὴ

ᾐ	ῃ
ᾑ	hῃ
ᾒ	ῂ
ᾓ	hῂ
ᾔ	ῂ
ᾕ	hῂ
ᾖ	ῂ
ᾗ	hῂ

//iota
ί	ὶ
ί	ὶ
ῖ	ὶ

ἰ	ι
ἱ	hι
ἲ	ὶ
ἳ	hὶ
ἴ	ὶ
ἵ	hὶ
ἶ	ὶ
ἷ	hὶ

ΐ	ῒ
ῗ	ῒ

// omicron
ό	ὸ
ό	ὸ
ὀ	ο
ὁ	hο
ὂ	ὸ
ὃ	hὸ
ὄ	ὸ
ὅ	hὸ

// upsilon
ύ	ὺ
ύ	ὺ
ῦ	ὺ

ὐ	υ
ὑ	hυ
ὒ	ὺ
ὓ	hὺ
ὔ	ὺ
ὕ	hὺ
ὖ	ὺ
ὗ	hὺ

ΰ	ῢ
ῧ	ῢ

// omega
ώ	ὼ
ώ	ὼ
ῴ	ῲ
ῶ	ὼ
ῷ	ῲ

ὠ	ω
ὡ	hω
ὢ	ὼ
ὣ	hὼ
ὤ	ὼ
ὥ	hὼ
ὦ	ὼ
ὧ	hὼ

ᾠ	ῳ
ᾡ	hῳ
ᾢ	ῲ
ᾣ	hῲ
ᾤ	ῲ
ᾥ	hῲ
ᾦ	ῲ
ᾧ	hῲ

// rho
ῤ	ρ
ῥ	hρ


.group α
	α        a
	αι       aI
	αὶ      'aI
	αυ       aU
	αὺ      'aU
	αhι      haI
	αhὶ     'haI
	αhυ      haU
	αhὺ     'haU

.group β
	β        b


.group γ
	γ        g
	γγ       Ng

.group δ
	δ        d


.group ε
	ε        e
	ει       e:
	εὶ      'e:
	ευ       eU
	εὺ      'eU
	εhι      he:
	εhὶ     'he:
	εhυ      heU
	εhὺ     'heU

.group ζ
	ζ        z


.group η
	η        E:
	ηι       EI:
	ηὶ      'EI:
	ηυ       EU:
	ηὺ      'EU:
	ηhι      hEI:
	ηhὶ     'hEI:
	ηhυ      hEU:
	ηhὺ     'hEU:

.group θ
	θ        T


.group ι
	ι        i


.group ϊ
	ϊ        i


.group κ
	κ        k


.group λ
	λ        l


.group μ
	μ        m


.group ν
	ν        n


.group ξ
	ξ        ks


.group ο
	ο        o
	οι       oI
	οὶ      'oI
	ου       u:
	οὺ      'u:
	οhι      hoI
	οhὶ     'hoI
	οhυ      hu:
	οhὺ     'hu:

.group π
	π        p


.group ρ
	ρ        R


.group ς
	ς        s


.group σ
	σ        s


.group τ
	τ        t


.group υ
	υ        y
	υι       yI
	υὶ      'yI
	υhι      hyI
	υhὶ     'hyI

.group ϋ
	ϋ        y
	ϋι       yI
	ϋὶ      'yI
	ϋhι      hyI
	ϋhὶ     'hyI

.group φ
	φ        f


.group χ
	χ        x


.group ψ
	ψ        ps


.group ω
	ω        O:
	ωι       OI:
	ωὶ      'OI:
	ωυ       OU:
	ωὺ      'OU:
	ωhι      hOI:
	ωhὶ     'hOI:
	ωhυ      hOU:
	ωhὺ     'hOU:



.group h   // dasia (rough breathing)
	h        h


// Latin letters to equivalent Greek sounds (plus 'q = η' 'w = ω'
.group a
	a	a
	ai	aI
	au	aU

.group b
	b	b

.group d
	d	d

.group e
	e	e
	ei	e:
	eu	eU

.group f
	f	f

.group g
	g	g
	gg	Ng

.group i
	i	i

.group ï
	ï	i

.group j
	j	j

.group k
	k	k
	kh	x

.group l
	l	l

.group m
	m	m

.group n
	n	n

.group o
	o	o
	oi	oI
	ou	u:

.group p
	p	p
	ph	f

.group q
	q	E:
	qi	EI:
	qu	EU:

.group r
	r	R

.group s
	s	s

.group t
	t	t
	th	T

.group u
	u	y
	ui	yI

.group v
	v	v

.group w
	w	O:
	wi	OI
	wu	OU

.group x
	x	x

.group y
	y	y
	yi	yI

.group z
	z	z


.group
	ὰ       'a
	ᾳ        aI:
	ᾲ       'aI:
	ὲ       'e
	ὴ       'E:
	ῃ        EI:
	ῂ       'EI:
	ὶ       'i
	ῒ       'i
	ὸ       'o
	ὺ       'y
	ῢ       'y
	ὼ       'O:
	ῳ        OI:
	ῲ       'OI:

	'	=	// apostrophe used as tonos, stress on previous syllable
